Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.150

Board of trustees—Meetings—Rules—Quorum.

The district board shall provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings, and the manner of calling them, and shall establish rules for its proceedings.

Special meetings may be called by three members, notice of which shall be given to each member at least twenty-four hours before the meeting.

All of its sessions, whether regular or special, shall be open to the public.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

[ 1957 c 153 s 15.]